Nevada, session 83, SB375.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 672 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
A credit union that qualifies and is approved for designation as
a low-income credit union pursuant to 12 C.F.R. § 701.34, as
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
amended, may issue shares to nonmembers. The total number of
shares issued by the credit union to nonmembers must not exceed
20 percent of the unimpaired capital and surplus of the credit
union unless the credit union obtains written authorization from
the Commissioner.
Sec. 2. NRS 672.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.250 [The] 1. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, the Commissioner shall administer the provisions of this
chapter, subject to administrative supervision by the Director.
2. The Commissioner shall make the decisions and
determinations and adopt regulations which are necessary or
reasonably appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.
3. The Commissioner may issue an order to temporarily
suspend a regulation of the Commissioner adopted pursuant to
this chapter, in accordance with the requirements of this section,
if:
(a) The Governor or the Legislature proclaims the existence of
a state of emergency or issues a declaration of disaster pursuant to
NRS 414.070; or
(b) The Commissioner determines that the order is in the
public interest.
4. An order issued pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Is effective for not more than 90 days unless the
Commissioner extends the order for one additional period of not
more than 90 days. The Commissioner shall not extend an order
issued pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3 more than once.
(b) Must include:
(1) The regulation that the order suspends;
(2) The specific reason for the order, including, without
limitation, the public interest which is served by the order, if
applicable; and
(3) The date on which the order becomes effective and the
date on which the order terminates.
5. If the Commissioner issues an order to temporarily
suspend a regulation pursuant to subsection 3, the Commissioner
shall promptly provide written notice and a copy of the order to
any credit union subject to the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 3. NRS 672.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.310 1. The Secretary of State shall not issue any
certificate of incorporation to any credit union authorizing it to do
business in this state until the articles of incorporation are approved
by the Commissioner.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2. An amendment to the articles of incorporation may not be
filed by the Secretary of State without the written approval of the
Commissioner.
3. Not less than seven persons who are residents of Nevada,
have a common bond and are of legal age who desire to organize a
credit union under this chapter shall first execute in triplicate an
application, upon forms to be issued by the Commissioner, for
permission to organize an association. The applicants shall submit
with or include in their application:
(a) A copy of the articles of incorporation which must comply
with the provisions of NRS 81.440 except where those provisions
conflict with the provisions of this chapter.
(b) The par value of the shares, which must be [$5] $1 or some
multiple thereof.
(c) The names and addresses of the applicants and an itemized
account of the financial condition of the applicants and the proposed
credit union.
(d) The name, which must include the words “credit union,” and
the principal place of business.
(e) Any additional information which the Commissioner may
require to determine the character and responsibility of the
applicants and the need for a credit union in the community to be
served.
 The incorporators shall submit a set of proposed bylaws to the
Commissioner with their application and the bylaws when approved
by the Commissioner are effective upon filing the articles of
incorporation. The Commissioner shall approve or disapprove the
application within 30 days following its receipt.
4. Every application for permission to organize, as provided for
in this section, must be accompanied by an application fee and a fee
payment to cover expenses attendant upon the investigation required
for approval. The amount of the fees must be established by
regulation adopted by the Commissioner.
5. The subscribers for a credit union charter shall not transact
any business until formal approval of the charter has been received.
Sec. 4. NRS 672.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.330 1. A credit union may maintain, with the approval of
the Commissioner, offices at locations other than its main office . [if
the maintenance of] The Commissioner shall approve or deny any
application to open an additional office within 60 days after the
[offices is reasonably necessary to furnish service to its members.]
date on which the Commissioner receives the application.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
2. A credit union may change its principal place of business
within this state upon providing written notice to the Division of
Financial Institutions.
3. A credit union may share office space with one or more
credit unions and contract with a corporation to provide facilities or
personnel.
Sec. 5. NRS 672.350 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.350 1. The business affairs of a credit union shall be
directed by an odd-numbered board of not fewer than five directors
to be elected at the annual meetings by and from the members, and
an audit and credit committee if appointed by the board. The
persons designated in the articles of incorporation shall be the first
directors.
2. All members of the board and such committees shall hold
office for such terms as the bylaws may provide.
3. Vacancies in the board of directors shall be filled by vote of
the [members at the annual meeting or at a special meeting called
for that purpose. The] board [may fill any vacancies occurring in] of
directors for the remainder of the [board until successors elected at]
unexpired term, after which the [annual meeting or special meeting
have qualified.] seat shall be filled by vote of the members
according to the established procedures of the credit union for
nomination and election.
4. The board shall also fill vacancies in the credit and audit
committees.
Sec. 6. NRS 672.360 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.360 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
2, the board of directors is responsible for the general direction of
the affairs, funds and records of the credit union and shall meet as
often as necessary to accomplish their duties, but not less than [once
a month.] six times during each calendar year, including not less
than one time during each calendar quarter.
2. The Commissioner may require the board to meet more
frequently than six times during any calendar year if the
Commissioner determines it is necessary to address matters
relating to an examination conducted pursuant to this chapter.
3. The board may appoint an executive committee of not less
than three directors who may be authorized, by a majority vote of
the whole board, to act for the board subject to any conditions or
limitations the board may prescribe.
4. Except as otherwise provided in the articles of
incorporation or the bylaws, the board of directors may conduct a
meeting through electronic communications, videoconferencing,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
teleconferencing or other available technology which allows the
directors to communicate simultaneously or sequentially.
Participating in a meeting pursuant to this subsection constitutes
presence in person at the meeting.
Sec. 7. NRS 672.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.380 The directors may:
1. Act upon applications for membership or appoint one or
more membership officers from the members of the credit union or
from the officers, directors or employees of the credit union to act
upon membership applications subject to conditions imposed by the
board. If membership officers are appointed they shall submit at
each board meeting a list of approved or pending applications for
membership.
2. Invest surplus funds or designate an officer or committee to
be responsible for making investments subject to rules and
procedures established by the board of directors.
3. Authorize the employment of persons necessary to carry on
the business of the credit union.
4. Authorize the conveyance of property.
5. Borrow or lend money to carry on the functions of the credit
union.
6. Appoint any special committees which the board feels
necessary to carry on the business of the credit union.
7. Perform or authorize any action not inconsistent with this
chapter and not specifically reserved by the bylaws for the members.
8. Employ a general manager to be in charge of operations or,
in lieu thereof, designate the treasurer to act as general manager and
be in active charge of the affairs of the credit union.
9. Amend the bylaws of the credit union.
Sec. 8. NRS 672.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.510 1. The membership of a particular credit union shall
be limited to the subscribers to the articles of incorporation and such
other persons who have:
(a) The common bond set forth in the bylaws;
(b) [Paid the] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
paid an entrance fee , if an entrance fee is provided for in the
bylaws;
(c) [Subscribed] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
subscribed for one or more shares and have paid the initial
installment thereon; and
(d) Complied with other requirements specified in the articles of
incorporation or bylaws.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
2. A credit union may, in connection with a promotion that is
equally available to any prospective member, pay either or both of
the following for any prospective member who otherwise qualifies
for membership:
(a) Any entrance fee required by paragraph (b) of subsection
1; or
(b) The cost of the shares or the initial installment required by
paragraph (c) of subsection 1.
3. The common bond required for membership in credit unions
organized under the provisions of this chapter may include, but are
not limited to persons who:
(a) Have a similar occupation, association or interest;
(b) Reside within [an identifiable] a well-defined neighborhood,
community or rural district; or
(c) Are employed by the same employer,
 and members of the immediate families of such persons.
[3.] 4. Any member of a credit union who loses the bond that is
characteristic of all other members may be permitted to retain his or
her membership in the credit union at the discretion of the board of
directors.
Sec. 9. NRS 672.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.530 1. Shares may be subscribed to, paid for and
transferred in such manner as the bylaws may prescribe. The bylaws
may specify a dollar amount for the par value of a share or
require the par value of a share to be determined from time to time
by resolution of the board of directors. A certificate shall not be
issued to denote ownership of a share in a credit union.
2. The credit union may impress a lien on the shares, deposits,
accumulated dividends or interest of a member in his or her
individual, joint or trust account for any sum due the credit union
from such member or for any loan endorsed by him or her.
3. If the losses of any credit union, resulting from a
depreciation in value of its loans or investments or otherwise,
exceed its undivided earnings and reserve fund so that the estimated
value of its assets is less than the total amount due the shareholders,
the credit union may, by a majority vote of the entire membership,
order a reduction in the shares of each of its shareholders to divide
the loss proportionately among the members. If thereafter the credit
union realizes from such assets a greater amount than was fixed by
the order of reduction, such excess shall be divided among the
shareholders whose assets were reduced, but only to the extent of
such reduction.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Sec. 10. NRS 672.550 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.550 1. The annual meeting and any special meetings of
the members of the credit union shall be held at the time and place
and in the manner indicated in the bylaws.
2. The credit union shall provide members with a reasonable
opportunity to participate in a meeting and to vote. Except as
otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws,
members may participate in a meeting through electronic
communications, videoconferencing, teleconferencing or other
available technology which allows the members to communicate
simultaneously or sequentially. Participating in a meeting
pursuant to this subsection constitutes presence in person at the
meeting.
3. A member may not vote by proxy, but a society, association,
copartnership or corporation having membership in the credit union
may be represented and vote by one of its members or shareholders
if such person has been fully authorized by the governing body of
the society, association, copartnership or corporation to represent it.
[3.] 4. At all meetings a member has but one vote irrespective
of his or her share holdings.
Sec. 11. NRS 672.670 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.670 1. [Before the payment of any dividend, the gross
earnings of the] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, each
credit union [must be determined. From the gross earnings] shall
establish and maintain a regular reserve [against losses must be set
aside according to] account in accordance with the [following
schedule:
(a) Until the regular reserve equals 7.5 percent of the
outstanding loans and risk assets, all] requirements of 12 C.F.R.
Part 702 which are applicable to federally insured state-chartered
credit unions . [with assets of $500,000 or less] A credit union that
is insured by a private insurer shall [withhold 10 percent of] give
notice to or seek approval from the [gross earnings. Thereafter, 5
percent of the gross income must be withheld until the regular
reserve reaches 10 percent of the outstanding loans and risk assets.
(b) Whenever a credit union has assets of more than $500,000
and has been] Commissioner under any circumstances in
[operation for at least 4 years, it shall maintain its regular reserve as
follows:
(1) Until the regular reserve equals 4 percent of the
outstanding loans and risk assets, the credit union shall withhold 10
percent of its gross earnings.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(2) Thereafter, until the regular reserve equals 6 percent of its
outstanding loan and risk assets, the credit union shall withhold 5
percent of its gross earnings.
(c) Whenever the regular reserve falls below the required levels,
it must be replenished by regular contributions sufficient to maintain
the regular reserve at the levels required by paragraphs (a) and (b).]
which a federally insured credit union is required to give such
notice or seek such approval from the National Credit Union
Administration.
2. [The] In addition to the regular reserve [belongs to the]
account required by subsection 1, each credit union [and must not
be distributed except on liquidation of the credit union or] shall
establish special reserves in accordance with [a plan approved by]
the [Commissioner.] requirements of NRS 672.680.
3. Except as otherwise prohibited by the Commissioner, if the
board of directors of a credit union determines it is necessary or
desirable, the board may establish a reserve account which
exceeds the minimum required pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 12. NRS 672.710 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.710 1. [A] Except as otherwise provided in subsection
5, a credit union may make loans to members in accordance with the
provisions of the bylaws and policies established by the board of
directors upon receipt of approval by the credit committee or loan
officer at a rate of interest agreed upon by the credit union and
member.
2. Every [application for a] loan must be [made in writing
upon] evidenced by a [form furnished by the credit union] record
which [has been approved by] is adequate to support enforcement
or collection of the [board. The application] loan and any review of
the loan by the credit union or the Commissioner. Any such loan
must [include] comply with the [purpose for which the loan is
desired] requirements of this chapter and [the security, if] any [,
offered.] regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
3. A loan must not be made to any member in an aggregate
amount in excess of 10 percent of the credit union’s unimpaired
capital and surplus.
4. A credit union may participate with other credit unions,
corporations or financial institutions in making loans to credit union
members.
5. A credit union may permit a nonmember to participate in
an obligation or extension of credit to a member as a joint
applicant, joint obligor, co-borrower, surety or guarantor. Except
as otherwise provided by law, a credit union shall not extend any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
other benefit or service of the credit union to a nonmember solely
as a result of participation as a joint applicant, joint obligor, co-
borrower, surety or guarantor unless the nonmember is thereafter
admitted as a member of the credit union.
6. A member may receive a loan in installments or in one sum
and may pay the whole or any part of his or her loan on any day on
which the office of the credit union is open for business.
Sec. 13. NRS 672.760 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.760 1. Money not used in loans to members may be
invested in:
[1.] (a) Securities, obligations, participations or other
instruments of or issued by or fully guaranteed as to principal and
interest by the United States of America or any agency thereof or in
any trust or trusts established for investing directly or collectively in
these instruments;
[2.] (b) Obligations of this state or any political subdivision
thereof, including, without limitation, a city, county or school
district;
[3.] (c) Certificates of deposit or passbook type accounts issued
by a state or national bank, mutual savings bank, savings and loan
association or savings bank;
[4.] (d) Loans to or shares or deposits of other credit unions as
permitted by the bylaws;
[5.] (e) Capital shares, obligations or preferred stock issues of
any agency or association organized either as a stock company,
mutual association or membership corporation if the membership or
stockholdings, as the case may be, of the agency or association are
confined or restricted to credit unions or organizations of credit
unions, and the purposes for which the agency or association is
organized are designed to service or otherwise assist credit union
operations;
[6.] (f) Shares of a cooperative society organized under the laws
of this state or the United States in a total amount not exceeding 10
percent of the shares, deposits and surplus of the credit union;
[7.] (g) Stocks and bonds of United States corporations to a
maximum of 5 percent of unallocated reserves, except that such an
investment must be limited to stocks or bonds yielding income
which are approved by the Commissioner;
[8.] (h) Loans to any credit union association, national or state,
of which the credit union is a member, except that such an
investment must be limited to 1 percent of the shares, capital
deposits and unimpaired surplus of the credit union; [and
9.] (i) Negotiable obligations of federal or state banks [.] ; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(j) Municipal bonds which are issued by a public entity outside
of this State, if the credit union conducts and documents an
analysis which reasonably concludes that the security is at least
investment grade and ensures that:
(1) The aggregate municipal securities holdings of the
credit union are not more than 75 percent of the net worth of the
credit union; and
(2) The municipal securities holdings issued by any single
issuer to the credit union are not more than 25 percent of the net
worth of the credit union.
2. As used in this section, “investment grade” means a
security which has achieved a minimum credit rating which is
approved by the Commissioner from Moody’s Ratings, S&P
Global Ratings or Fitch Ratings to be considered investment
grade.
Sec. 14. NRS 672.765 is hereby amended to read as follows:
672.765 1. A credit union [must not invest in fixed assets
without the prior approval of] may, subject to any regulations
adopted by the Commissioner [if the aggregate value] and any
limitations imposed by 12 C.F.R. §§ 701.36(c) and 701.36(d),
purchase, hold and dispose of property necessary or incidental to
the operations of the credit [union’s existing fixed assets exceeds 7
percent of its total assets.] union.
2. A credit union shall notify, request approval from or seek a
waiver from the Commissioner under any circumstances in which
a federal credit union is required to notify, request approval from
or seek a waiver from the National Credit Union Administration
pursuant to 12 C.F.R. §§ 701.36(c) and 701.36(d).
Sec. 15. NRS 233B.039 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.039 1. The following agencies are entirely exempted
from the requirements of this chapter:
(a) The Governor.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 and NRS
209.221 and 209.2473, the Department of Corrections.
(c) The Nevada System of Higher Education.
(d) The Office of the Military.
(e) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 368A.140 and 463.765,
the Nevada Gaming Commission.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 425.620, the Division
of Welfare and Supportive Services of the Department of Health and
Human Services.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(h) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 422.390, the Division
of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 533.365, the Office of
the State Engineer.
(j) The Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry acting to enforce the provisions of
NRS 618.375.
(k) The Administrator of the Division of Industrial Relations of
the Department of Business and Industry in establishing and
adjusting the schedule of fees and charges for accident benefits
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 616C.260.
(l) The Board to Review Claims in adopting resolutions to carry
out its duties pursuant to NRS 445C.310.
(m) The Silver State Health Insurance Exchange.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and NRS
391.323, the Department of Education, the Board of the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program and the Commission on Professional
Standards in Education are subject to the provisions of this chapter
for the purpose of adopting regulations but not with respect to any
contested case.
3. The special provisions of:
(a) Chapter 612 of NRS for the adoption of an emergency
regulation or the distribution of regulations by and the judicial
review of decisions of the Employment Security Division of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation;
(b) Chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS for the
determination of contested claims;
(c) Chapter 91 of NRS for the judicial review of decisions of the
Administrator of the Securities Division of the Office of the
Secretary of State; and
(d) NRS 90.800 for the use of summary orders in contested
cases,
 prevail over the general provisions of this chapter.
4. The provisions of NRS 233B.122, 233B.124, 233B.125 and
233B.126 do not apply to the Department of Health and Human
Services in the adjudication of contested cases involving the
issuance of letters of approval for health facilities and agencies.
5. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Any order for immediate action, including, but not limited
to, quarantine and the treatment or cleansing of infected or infested
animals, objects or premises, made under the authority of the State
Board of Agriculture, the State Board of Health, or any other agency
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
of this State in the discharge of a responsibility for the preservation
of human or animal health or for insect or pest control;
(b) An extraordinary regulation of the State Board of Pharmacy
adopted pursuant to NRS 453.2184;
(c) A regulation adopted by the State Board of Education
pursuant to NRS 388.255 or 394.1694;
(d) The judicial review of decisions of the Public Utilities
Commission of Nevada;
(e) The adoption, amendment or repeal of policies by the
Rehabilitation Division of the Department of Employment, Training
and Rehabilitation pursuant to NRS 426.561 or 615.178;
(f) The adoption or amendment of a rule or regulation to be
included in the State Plan for Services for Victims of Crime by the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to
NRS 217.130;
(g) The adoption, amendment or repeal of rules governing the
conduct of contests and exhibitions of unarmed combat by the
Nevada Athletic Commission pursuant to NRS 467.075;
(h) The adoption, amendment or repeal of standards of content
and performance for courses of study in public schools by the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools and the
State Board of Education pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(i) The adoption, amendment or repeal of the statewide plan to
allocate money from the Fund for a Resilient Nevada created by
NRS 433.732 established by the Department of Health and Human
Services pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.734;
[or]
(j) The adoption or amendment of a data request by the
Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to NRS 687B.404 [.] ; or
(k) An order issued by the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 672.250.
6. The State Board of Parole Commissioners is subject to the
provisions of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations but
not with respect to any contested case.
7. The Department of Corrections is subject to the provisions
of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations relating to
fiscal policy, correspondence with inmates and visitation with
inmates of the Department of Corrections.
Sec. 16. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 15, inclusive, of this act become effective:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)